District of Columbia statutes.
10-511.04

Tunnel under Capitol Grounds and Botanic Garden grounds — Restoration of grounds to original condition.

All areas of square W-576 and reservations 12 and 6B disturbed by reason of operations under this subchapter shall, except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, be restored to their original condition to the satisfaction of the Architect of the Capitol.

History

July 21, 1964, 78 Stat. 334, Pub. L. 88-381, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-138.
1973 Ed., § 9-142.